test/sample2.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- commentyy before pardef -->
    <pardef n="S__encimpyy">
    <!-- commentyy before e -->
    <e>
    <!-- commentyy before p -->
      <p>
        <l>-enyy</l>
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e><!-- commentyy after e -->   
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-layy</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>    
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="achèt/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="S__encimp"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><prm/>è</l>
        <r>e<prm/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="achèt/e__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <i>e<prm/></i>
      <par n="achet/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yyach/e[T]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><prm/>è</l>
        <r>e<prm/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="achèt/e__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <i>e<prm/></i>
      <par n="achet/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yy2ach/e[T]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><prm/>è</l>
        <r>e<prm/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="achèt/e__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <i>e<prm/></i>
      <par n="achet/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <!-- Verbs -->
    <e lm="yyamener"><i>yyam</i><par n="yyach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/></e>
    <e lm="yyacheter"><i>ach</i><par n="yyach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
    <e lm="enlever"><i>enl</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/></e>
    <e lm="acheter"><i>ach</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>

  </section>
</dictionary>
